Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 1
DEFINITIONS

19-3-100.5. Legislative declarations - reasonable efforts - movement of children and sibling groups.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the stability and preservation of the families of this state and the safety and protection of children are matters of statewide concern. The general assembly finds that the federal "Adoption Assistance
and Child Welfare Act of 1980", federal Public Law 96-272, requires that each state make a commitment to make "reasonable efforts" to prevent the placement of abused and neglected children out of the home and to reunify the family
whenever appropriate.

The general assembly further finds that the federal "Adoption and Safe Families Act of 1997", federal Public Law 105-89, clarifies what constitutes "reasonable efforts" by decreeing that when deciding whether to make such efforts and in the process of
making such efforts, the health and safety of the child is the paramount concern. This federal law further encourages expediting permanency planning for children in out-of-home placement by removing barriers to permanency and streamlining
entitlement services. The law specifies that one of the goals of all placement decisions, whether leaving the child in the home or placing the child outside the home, is safety for the child.

The general assembly further finds that the implementation of the federal "Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980", federal Public Law 96-272, is not the exclusive responsibility of the state department of social services or of local departments
of social services. Elected officials at the state and local levels must ensure that resources and services are available through state and local social services agencies and through the involvement of the resources of public and
private sources. Judges, attorneys, and guardians ad litem must be encouraged to take independent responsibility to ensure that "reasonable efforts" to prevent out-of-home placements have been made only when appropriate, that permanency
occurs for children in foster care, and that safe child placements occur in each case.

The general assembly also hereby finds that:

The American Academy of Pediatrics has found that emotional and cognitive disruptions in the early lives of children have the potential to impair brain development. Paramount in the lives of children in foster care is their need for continuity with their
primary attachment figures and a sense of permanence that is enhanced when the child's placement is stable.

The American Academy of Pediatrics has found that attachment to a primary caregiver is essential to the development of emotional security and social conscience; and

According to the American Academy of Pediatrics, optimal child development occurs when a spectrum of needs is consistently met over an extended period. Separation of a child from his or her primary caregiver occurring between six months and three years
of age is more likely to result in subsequent emotional disturbances for the child than if the separation occurs when the child is older. Repeated moves from home to home compound the adverse consequences of separation.
Further, the younger the child and the more extended the period of uncertainty or separation, the more detrimental the separation will be to the child's well-being. Any intervention that separates a child from the
child's primary caregiver or person who provides psychological support to the child should be cautiously considered and treated as a matter of urgency and profound importance.

The general assembly further finds that older children in foster care are at a high risk of having long-term mental health issues, dropping out of school, developing alcohol and drug dependence, experiencing promiscuity, and interacting with the criminal
justice system. Multiple moves for older children lead to disruption in schooling and meaningful relationships and attachments, including relationships with peers and family of origin. As a result these children have few,
if any, long-term connections when they leave foster care, resulting in little support for their growth into independent adults.

The general assembly therefore declares that multiple moves for children in the dependency and neglect system should be discouraged in favor of permanent planning upon which these children can rely for their healthy mental, physical, and emotional development.

Therefore, in order to carry out the requirements addressed in this section, to ensure stability in placements, to preserve families, and to decrease the need for out-of-home placement, the general assembly shall define "reasonable efforts" and identify
the services and processes that must be in place to ensure that "reasonable efforts" have been made. The general assembly provides that "reasonable efforts" are deemed to be met when a county or city and county provides services
in accordance with section 19-3-208 and when full consideration has been given to the provisions of section 24-34-805 (2).

Source:

L. 93:
Entire section added, p. 2012, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:
Entire section amended, p. 1053, § 2, effective May 4.

L. 98:
Entire section amended, p. 1416, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:
Entire section amended, (HB 15-1337), ch. 328, p. 1340, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2018:
(5) amended, (HB 18-1104), ch. 164, p. 1134, § 5, effective April 25.

19-3-101. Definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 759, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 93:
Entire section amended, p. 2013, § 2, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 582, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(1) amended, p. 1084, § 3, effective May 4.

L. 96:
Entire section repealed, p. 85, § 11, effective March 20.

Cross references:
For current applicable definitions, see § 19-1-103.

19-3-102. Neglected or dependent child.

A child is neglected or dependent if:

A parent, guardian, or legal custodian has abandoned the child or has subjected him or her to mistreatment or abuse or a parent, guardian, or legal custodian has suffered or allowed another to mistreat or abuse the child without taking lawful means to
stop such mistreatment or abuse and prevent it from recurring;

The child lacks proper parental care through the actions or omissions of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian;

The child's environment is injurious to his or her welfare;

A parent, guardian, or legal custodian fails or refuses to provide the child with proper or necessary subsistence, education, medical care, or any other care necessary for his or her health, guidance, or well-being;

The child is homeless, without proper care, or not domiciled with his or her parent, guardian, or legal custodian through no fault of such parent, guardian, or legal custodian;

The child has run away from home or is otherwise beyond the control of his or her parent, guardian, or legal custodian;

The child is born affected by alcohol or substance exposure, except when taken as prescribed or recommended and monitored by a licensed health care provider, and the newborn child's health or welfare is threatened by substance use.

A child is neglected or dependent if:

A parent, guardian, or legal custodian has subjected another child or children to an identifiable pattern of habitual abuse; and

Such parent, guardian, or legal custodian has been the respondent in another proceeding under this article in which a court has adjudicated another child to be neglected or dependent based upon allegations of sexual or physical abuse, or a court of competent
jurisdiction has determined that such parent's, guardian's, or legal custodian's abuse or neglect has caused the death of another child; and

The pattern of habitual abuse described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) and the type of abuse described in the allegations specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) pose a current threat to the child.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 760, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 97:
Entire section amended, p. 516, § 2, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1433, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
(1)(g) added, p. 587, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2020:
(1)(g) amended, (SB 20-028), ch. 186, p. 854, § 5, effective June 30.

19-3-103. Child not neglected - when.

No child who in lieu of medical treatment is under treatment solely by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with a recognized method of religious healing shall, for that reason alone, be considered to have been neglected or dependent within the
purview of this article. However, the religious rights of a parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall not limit the access of a child to medical care in a life-threatening situation or when the condition will result in serious
disability. In order to make a determination as to whether the child is in a life-threatening situation or that the child's condition will result in serious disability, the court may, as provided under section 19-1-104 (3), order
a medical evaluation of the child. If the court determines, on the basis of any relevant evidence before the court, including the medical evaluation ordered pursuant to this section, that the child is in a life-threatening situation
or that the child's condition will result in serious disability, the court may, as provided under section 19-1-104 (3), order that medical treatment be provided for the child. A child whose parent, guardian, or legal custodian
inhibits or interferes with the provision of medical treatment in accordance with a court order shall be considered to have been neglected or dependent for the purposes of this article and injured or endangered for the purposes
of section 18-6-401, C.R.S.

A method of religious healing shall be presumed to be a recognized method of religious healing if:

Fees and expenses incurred in connection with such treatment are permitted to be deducted from taxable income as medical expenses pursuant to regulations or rules promulgated by the United States internal revenue service; and

Fees and expenses incurred in connection with such treatment are generally recognized as reimbursable health-care expenses under medical policies of insurance issued by insurers licensed by this state; or

Such treatment provides a rate of success in maintaining health and treating disease or injury that is equivalent to that of medical treatment.

Refusing an immunization on the grounds of medical, religious, or personal belief considerations, as set forth in section 25-4-903, or opting to exclude immunization notification information from the immunization tracking system established in section
25-4-2403 (7) by itself does not constitute child abuse or neglect by a parent or legal guardian for the purposes of this article 3.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 760, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
Entire section amended, p. 924, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 92:
Entire section amended, p. 174, § 2, effective April 16.

L. 93:
(1) amended, p. 1637, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 2020:
(3) added, (HB 20-1297), ch. 264, p. 1266, § 1, effective September 14.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-1-114 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-104. Hearings - procedure.

Any hearing conducted pursuant to this article 3 in a county designated pursuant to section 19-1-123 regarding a child who is under six years of age at the time a petition is filed in accordance with section 19-3-501 (2) must not be delayed or continued
unless good cause is shown and unless the court finds that the best interests of the child will be served by granting a delay or continuance. Whenever any such delay or continuance is granted, the court shall set forth the specific
reasons necessitating the delay or continuance and shall schedule the matter within thirty days after the date of granting the delay or continuance. If appropriate, in any hearing conducted pursuant to this article 3 in a county designated
pursuant to section 19-1-123 regarding a child who is under six years of age at the time a petition is filed in accordance with section 19-3-501 (2), the court shall include all other children residing in the same household whose placement
is subject to determination pursuant to this article 3.

Source:

L. 94:
Entire section added, p. 2053, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2019:
Entire section amended, (HB 19-1219), ch. 237, p. 2355, § 5, effective August 2.